Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6229
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act shall apply to the practice of the religious tenets of any recognized church or religious denomination which includes healing solely by spiritual means through prayer.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 29.